Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.093

Civil action—Unfair or deceptive act or practice—Claim elements.

In a private action in which an unfair or deceptive act or practice is alleged under RCW 19.86.020, a claimant may establish that the act or practice is injurious to the public interest because it:

(1) Violates a statute that incorporates this chapter;

(2) Violates a statute that contains a specific legislative declaration of public interest impact; or

(3)(a) Injured other persons; (b) had the capacity to injure other persons; or (c) has the capacity to injure other persons.

[ 2009 c 371 s 2.]

NOTES:

Application—2009 c 371: See note following RCW 19.86.090.